Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-525
Health claim form; purposes of act.

The purposes of the Standardized Health Claim Form Act are to standardize the forms used in the billing and reimbursement of health care, reduce the number of forms utilized and increase efficiency in the reimbursement of health care through standardization, and encourage the use of electronic data interchange of health care expenses and reimbursement.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 53.